Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6387.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 30723. (1) This Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2), this part does not abrogate the requirements of other state statutes. (2) If the department denies a permit authorized under part 31, 301, 303, or 315 and the denial affects a delegated authority's statutory obligations to maintain a normal level under this part, an appeal of the denial of the permit is not subject to contested case proceedings under the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. The delegated authority that has been denied a permit as provided under this subsection has the right to appeal the denial directly to the court having continuing jurisdiction, as provided in section 30707(5), not later than 60 days after the permit is denied. The court having continuing jurisdiction shall hear the matter de novo and is not limited in its review of the denied permit. The court having continuing jurisdiction shall grant the permit if the court finds that granting the permit will provide all of the following: (a) The most benefit to the public. (b) The best protection of public health, safety, and welfare. (c) The best preservation of the natural resources of this state. (d) The best preservation of the value of property around the inland lake.